lt-LT: Padengimo lygis: Reguliuojamas; Sluoksniuojamas; Spalvą koreguojantis; Stora; Didelis padengimas; Lengvas; Vidutinis; Permatomos; Kita
zh-CN: 遮盖度: 可调节; 可叠加; 色彩校正; 全; 高覆盖; 轻; 中度; 裸色; 其他
zh-TW: 遮蓋程度: 可調節式; 可疊加; 校色; 全面的; 高度遮蓋; 輕型; 中等; 純粹; 其他
hu: Fedési szint: Állítható; Rétegben alkalmazható; Színkorrigáló; Teljes; Magas fedettség; Világos; Közepes; Áttetsző; Egyéb
sl-SI: Stopnja prekrivnosti: Prilagodljiva; Za stopnjevanje; Za korekcijo barve; Polna; Visoka prekrivnost; Svetlo; Medij; Prosojna; Drugo
pt-BR: Nível de cobertura: Ajustável; Construível; Corretor de cor; Completa; Alta cobertura; Leve; Médio; Transparente; Outro
el: Επίπεδο κάλυψης: Ρυθμιζόμενο; Χτιζόμενη; Διόρθωση χρώματος; Γεμάτη; Υψηλή κάλυψη; Ελαφριά; Μέση; Λεπτό; Άλλο
ko: 커버리지 수준: 조절식; 빌더블; 컬러 코렉팅; 전체; 하이 커버리지; 가벼움; 중간; 얇은; 기타
da: Dækningsniveau: Justerbar; Opbyggelig; Farvekorrigerende; Fuldt; Høj dækning; Let; Medium; Ren; Andet
ru: Уровень покрытия: Регулируемый; Наслаиваемое; Цветокоррекция; Полноразмерная; Высокое покрытие; Легкая; Средний; Прозрачные; Другой
vi: Mức độ che phủ: Có thể điều chỉnh; Xây dựng được; Điều chỉnh màu; Toàn bộ; Che phủ cao; Nhẹ; Vừa; Mỏng; Khác
nl: Dekkingsniveau: Verstelbaar; Opbouwbaar; Kleurcorrigerend; Volledig; Hoge dekking; Licht; Medium; Puur; Andere
pl: Poziom krycia: Regulowane; Budowalne; Korygujące kolor; Pełna; Wysokie krycie; Lekki; Średni; Przezroczyste; Inne
sv: Täckningsnivå: Justerbar; Uppbyggbar; Färgkorrigerande; Full; Hög täckning; Lätt; Medium; Skir; Övrigt
es: Nivel de cobertura: Ajustable; Construible; Corrección de color; Total; Alta cobertura; Ligero; Medio; Transparentes; Otros
ro-RO: Nivelul de acoperire: Ajustabil; Modulabil; Corector de culoare; Completă; Acoperire mare; Scăzut; Medie; Transparent; Altele
de: Abdeckungsgrad: Einstellbar; Aufbaubar; Farbkorrigierend; Vollständig; Hohe Deckkraft; Leicht; Mittel; Leicht deckend; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Úroveň krytia: Nastaviteľný; Vrstviteľné; Korekcia farby; Plný; Vysoké krytie; Ľahký; Stredný; Jasný; Iné
cs: Úroveň krytí: Nastavitelný; Vrstvitelné; Korekce barev; Plný; Vysoké krytí; Lehká; Střední; Průsvitné; Jiné
pt-PT: Nível de cobertura: Ajustável; Modulável; Corretor de cor; Completo; Alta cobertura; Ligeira; Moagem média; Simples; Outro
fi: Peittokyky: Säädettävä; Kerrostettava; Väriä korjaava; Täysi; Korkea peittävyys; Kevyt; Keskimääräinen; Läpikuultava; Muu
hr-HR: Razina prekrivanja: Podesivo; Nadogradiv; Korekcija boje; Puna; Visoko pokrivanje; Lagana; Polusuho; Prozirne; Ostalo
fr: Niveau de couvrance: Ajustables; Modulable; Correcteur de couleur; Complet; Haute couvrance; Léger; Moyen; Transparent; Autre
bg-BG: Ниво на покритие: Регулируемо; Наслояващо се; Коригиращо цвета; Пълен; Високо покритие; Лека; Средна; Чист; Други
ja: カバレッジレベル: 調整可能; 重ね塗り可能; カラーコレクティング; フル; ハイカバレッジ; 軽い; 中挽き; シアー; その他
nb: Dekkenivå: Regulerbar; Byggbar; Fargekorrigerende; Full; Høy dekning; Lett; Middels; Ren; Annet
it: Livello di copertura: Regolabile; Modulabile; Correttivo del colore; Pieno; Alta coprenza; Leggero; Medio; Sheer; Altro
en: Coverage level: Adjustable; Buildable; Color correcting; Full; High coverage; Light; Medium; Sheer; Other
tr: Kapatıcılık seviyesi: Ayarlanabilir; Artırılabilir; Renk düzeltici; Tam; Yüksek kapatıcılık; Hafif; Orta; Şeffaf; Diğer
th: ระดับการปกปิด: แบบปรับได้; เพิ่มความเข้มได้; แก้ไขสีผิว; ทั้งหมด; ปกปิดสูง; ตึงเล็กน้อย; ปานกลาง; Sheer; อื่นๆ